Florida, session 2026, HB641.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
27
28 Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Freedom of
29 Conscience in the Workplace Act."
30 Section 2. Section 112.0456, Florida Statutes, is created
31 to read:
32 112.0456 Personal pronouns.—
33 (1) As used in this section, the term:
34 (a) "Adverse personnel action" means the discharge,
35 suspension, transfer, demotion, or lack of promotion of an
36 employee or a contractor; the withholding of bonuses; the
37 withholding of promotional opportunities; the reduction in
38 salary or benefits; or any other adverse action taken against an
39 employee or a contractor within the terms and conditions of
40 employment by an employer.
41 (b) "Contractor" means an individual, partnership,
42 corporation, or business entity that enters or attempts to enter
43 into a contract for services with an employer.
44 (c) "Employee" means an individual employed by, or
45 attempting to be employed by, an employer.
46 (d) "Employer" means the state or any county,
47 municipality, or special district or any subdivision or agency
48 thereof.
49 (e) "Gender identity" means a fully internal and
50 subjective sense of self, disconnected from biological reality
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb641-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 641 2026
51 and sex, and existing on an infinite continuum that does not
52 provide a meaningful basis for identification and cannot be
53 recognized as a replacement for sex.
54 (f) "Gender ideology" means the false belief that replaces
55 the biological category of sex with an ever-shifting concept of
56 self-assessed gender identity, permitting the false claim that
57 males can identify as and become women and vice versa, and
58 requiring all institutions of society to regard this false claim
59 as true. The term includes the idea that there is a vast
60 spectrum of genders that are disconnected from a person's sex.
61 Gender ideology is internally inconsistent in that it diminishes
62 sex as an identifiable or useful category but nevertheless
63 maintains that it is possible for a person to be born in the
64 wrong sexed body.
65 (g) "Sex" means the classification of a person as either
66 female or male based on the organization of the body of such
67 person for a specific reproductive role, as indicated by the
68 person's sex chromosomes, naturally occurring sex hormones, and
69 internal and external genitalia present at birth.
70 (2) It is the policy of this state that a person's sex is
71 an immutable biological trait and that it is false to ascribe to
72 a person a pronoun that does not correspond to such person's
73 sex. This section does not apply to individuals born with a
74 genetically or biochemically verifiable disorder of sex
75 development, including, but not limited to, 46,XX disorder of
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb641-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 641 2026
76 sex development; 46,XY disorder of sex development; sex
77 chromosome disorder of sex development; XX or XY sex reversal;
78 and ovotesticular disorder.
79 (3) An employee or a contractor may not be required, as a
80 condition of employment or to avoid adverse personnel action, to
81 refer to another person using that person's preferred pronouns
82 if such pronouns do not correspond to that person's sex.
83 (4) An employee or a contractor may not require an
84 employer to use his or her preferred pronouns if such preferred
85 pronouns do not correspond to the employee's or contractor's
86 sex.
87 (5) A job application or other related employment form
88 that requires an applicant to mark his or her sex may inquire if
89 the applicant is male or female only and may not provide a
90 nonbinary or other option.
91 (6)(a) It is an unlawful employment practice for an
92 employer to take adverse personnel action against an employee or
93 a contractor because of the employee's or contractor's deeply
94 held religious, moral, conscience-based, or biology-based
95 beliefs regarding gender ideology, whether those views are
96 expressed by the employee or contractor at or away from the
97 worksite.
98 (b) An employee or a contractor aggrieved by a violation
99 of this subsection may avail himself or herself to the
100 administrative and civil remedies provided in s. 760.11. The
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb641-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 641 2026
101 court shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the
102 prevailing party.
103 (7) The Department of Management Services may adopt rules
104 to administer this section.
105 Section 3. Subsections (10) and (11) of section 760.10,
106 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (11) and (12),
107 respectively, and a new subsection (10) is added to that
108 section, to read:
109 760.10 Unlawful employment practices.—
110 (10) It is an unlawful employment practice for an employer
111 who receives funding from the state to require, as a condition
112 of employment, any training, instruction, or other activity on
113 sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.
114 Section 4. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
115 made by this act to section 760.10, Florida Statutes, in a
116 reference thereto, subsections (1) and (15) of section 760.11,
117 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read:
118 760.11 Administrative and civil remedies; construction.—
119 (1) Any person aggrieved by a violation of ss. 760.01-
120 760.10 may file a complaint with the commission within 365 days
121 of the alleged violation, naming the employer, employment
122 agency, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee,
123 or, in the case of an alleged violation of s. 760.10(5), the
124 person responsible for the violation and describing the
125 violation. Any person aggrieved by a violation of s. 509.092 may
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb641-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 641 2026
126 file a complaint with the commission within 365 days of the
127 alleged violation naming the person responsible for the
128 violation and describing the violation. The commission, a
129 commissioner, or the Attorney General may in like manner file
130 such a complaint. On the same day the complaint is filed with
131 the commission, the commission shall clearly stamp on the face
132 of the complaint the date the complaint was filed with the
133 commission. In lieu of filing the complaint with the commission,
134 a complaint under this section may be filed with the federal
135 Equal Employment Opportunity Commission or with any unit of
136 government of the state which is a fair-employment-practice
137 agency under 29 C.F.R. ss. 1601.70-1601.80. If the date the
138 complaint is filed is clearly stamped on the face of the
139 complaint, that date is the date of filing. The date the
140 complaint is filed with the commission for purposes of this
141 section is the earliest date of filing with the Equal Employment
142 Opportunity Commission, the fair-employment-practice agency, or
143 the commission. The complaint shall contain a short and plain
144 statement of the facts describing the violation and the relief
145 sought. The commission may require additional information to be
146 in the complaint. The commission, within 5 days of the complaint
147 being filed, shall by registered mail send a copy of the
148 complaint to the person who allegedly committed the violation.
149 The person who allegedly committed the violation may file an
150 answer to the complaint within 25 days of the date the complaint
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb641-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 641 2026
151 was filed with the commission. Any answer filed shall be mailed
152 to the aggrieved person by the person filing the answer. Both
153 the complaint and the answer shall be verified.
154 (15) In any civil action or administrative proceeding
155 brought pursuant to this section, a finding that a person
156 employed by the state or any governmental entity or agency has
157 violated s. 760.10 shall as a matter of law constitute just or
158 substantial cause for such person's discharge.
159 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb641-01-c1